Alabama, session 2026rs, HB554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "State Energy Supply and Chemical Trade Stabilization
Act."
Section 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to
enhance the resilience of energy and chemical manufacturing
sectors by addressing the risks posed by global trade
disruptions and strengthening domestic production capacity.
Section 3. For the purposes of this Act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Economic and
Community Affairs.
(2) ELIGIBLE FACILITIES. Any taxpayer who is a
chemical or energy production facility located within the
state.
(3) FEEDSTOCK. Any raw material to supply or fuel a
machine or industrial process.
(4) INPUT. Any material required to initiate, produce,
and deliver goods or services.
(5) TRADE DISRUPTION. Any condition, including tariffs
or sanctions, that increases input costs, limits access to
equipment, or reduces export capacity.
Section 4. (a) The State Energy Supply and Chemical
Trade Stabilization Grant Program and the State Energy Supply
and Chemical Trade Stabilization Grant Fund are established
and shall be administered by the department to support
eligible facilities impacted by trade disruptions.
(b) Grant funds may be used to:
Page 2

(b) Grant funds may be used to:
HB554 INTRODUCED
(1) Mitigate financial losses;
(2) Implement supply chain modifications;
(3) Retain key personnel;
(4) Identify critical feedstocks and inputs vulnerable
to trade restrictions;
(5) Support research into domestic or alternative
inputs;
(6) Pilot commercial applications of substitute
materials or energy sources; or
(7) Support capital improvements to energy and chemical
infrastructure, including, but not limited to, the following:
a. Pipeline upgrades.
b. Chemical storage expansion.
c. Intermodal transport hubs.
d. Port facilities.
(c) The department shall issue guidelines for
application procedures and required documents.
(d) The aggregate amount of grants awarded pursuant to
this section shall not exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000)
in a calendar year.
Section 5. (a) A refundable income tax credit, known as
the Reshoring and Domestic Production Income Tax Credit, may
be claimed by eligible facilities for capital investment
projects relating to chemical and energy production in the
state.
(b) A taxpayer may claim a credit in an amount equal to
30 percent of the amount of qualifying investments made during
the tax year.
Page 3

the tax year.
HB554 INTRODUCED
(c) The income tax credit authorized by this act is
limited to an aggregate amount for all taxpayers of two
million dollars ($2,000,000) annually.
(d) The income tax credit is nontransferable and may be
carried forward for up to five years.
(e)(1) The income tax credit allowed under this section
may be claimed beginning with the 2027 tax year and may not be
claimed for tax years after the 2031 tax year, except for
carry-forward as provided in subsection (d).
(2) A taxpayer shall not claim this income tax credit
for more than three tax years.
(f) The Alabama Department of Revenue may adopt rules
for the implementation and administration of this section.
Section 6. (a) The Reshoring and Domestic Production
Loan Program is established and shall be administered by the
100 department to provide low-interest loans to eligible
101 facilities for site development and equipment acquisition.
102 (b) The amount of any low-interest loan shall not
103 exceed 30 percent of qualifying investment expenditures.
104 (c) The department shall establish rules for
105 application procedures and documentation requirements.
106 Section 7. (a) There is established the Chemical and
107 Energy Trade Risk Assessment Board to evaluate vulnerabilities
108 in chemical and energy trade flows and recommend strategic
109 countermeasures.
110 (b) The board shall consist of five members, each
111 appointed by the director of the department.
112 (c)(1) The first meeting shall be held by September 1,
Page 4

(c)(1) The first meeting shall be held by September 1,
HB554 INTRODUCED
113 2026, at which time the board shall elect a chair.
114 (2) The board shall meet no less than annually and at
115 the call of the chair.
116 (d) The board shall:
117 (1) Review supply chain dependencies;
118 (2) Identify trade vulnerabilities; and
119 (3) Recommend strategies for securing critical trade
120 flows.
121 (e) The board shall issue a biennial report to the
122 Governor and the Legislature on its activities, findings, and
123 recommendations.
124 (f) Each member of the board shall be reimbursed at the
125 same per diem and travel allowance amounts paid by law to
126 state employees for each day of attendance of the business of
127 the board.
128 Section 8. This act shall become effective on July 1,
129 2026.
Page 5